Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB36.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A public school district or public charter school shall not enter into a nondisclosure
agreement relating to misconduct involving a minor or student, including abusive
conduct as defined in Section 2 of this Act.
Section 2. KRS 160.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Abusive conduct" means sexual misconduct and conduct subject to
mandatory reporting under KRS 620.030 that involves a minor or student;
(b) "Administrative finding of child abuse or neglect" means a substantiated
finding of child abuse or neglect issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services that is:
1. Not appealed through an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
2. Upheld at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B and not appealed to a Circuit Court; or
3. Upheld by a Circuit Court in an appeal of the results of an
administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(c)[(b)] "Alternative education program" means a program that exists to meet
the needs of students that cannot be addressed in a traditional classroom
setting but through the assignment of students to alternative classrooms,
centers, or campuses that are designed to remediate academic performance,
improve behavior, or provide an enhanced learning experience. Alternative
education programs do not include career or technical centers or departments;
(d)[(c)] "Clear CA/N check" means a letter from the Cabinet for Health and
Page 1 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
Family Services indicating that there are no administrative findings of child
abuse or neglect relating to a specific individual;
(e)[(d)] "Relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son, and
daughter; and
(f)[(e)] "Vacancy" means any certified position opening created by the
resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or death of a certified
staff member of a local school district, or a new position created in a local
school district for which certification is required. However, if an employer-
employee bargained contract contains procedures for filling certified position
openings created by the resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract,
transfer, or death of a certified staff member, or creation of a new position for
which certification is required, a vacancy shall not exist, unless certified
positions remain open after compliance with those procedures.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 160.346, the school district personnel actions identified
in this section shall be carried out as follows:
(a) All appointments, promotions, and transfers of principals, supervisors,
teachers, and other public school employees shall be made only by the
superintendent of schools, who shall notify the board of the action taken. All
employees of the local district shall have the qualifications prescribed by law
and by the administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education and
of the employing board. Supervisors, principals, teachers, and other
employees may be appointed by the superintendent for any school year at any
time after February 1 preceding the beginning of the school year. No
superintendent of schools shall appoint or transfer himself or herself to
another position within the school district;
(b) When a vacancy occurs in a local school district, the superintendent shall
submit the job posting to the statewide job posting system described in KRS
Page 2 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
160.152 fifteen (15) days before the position shall be filled. The local school
district shall post position openings in the local board office for public
viewing;
(c) When a vacancy needs to be filled in less than fifteen (15) days' time to
prevent disruption of necessary instructional or support services of the school
district, the superintendent may seek a waiver from the chief state school
officer. If the waiver is approved, the appointment shall not be made until the
person recommended for the position has been approved by the chief state
school officer. The chief state school officer shall respond to a district's
request for waiver or for approval of an appointment within two (2) working
days; and
(d) When a vacancy occurs in a local district, the superintendent shall conduct a
search to locate minority teachers to be considered for the position. The
superintendent shall, pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky
Board of Education, report annually the district's recruitment process and the
activities used to increase the percentage of minority teachers in the district.
(3) Restrictions on employment of relatives shall be as follows:
(a) No relative of a superintendent of schools shall be an employee of the school
district. However, this shall not apply to a relative who is a classified or
certified employee of the school district for at least thirty-six (36) months
prior to the superintendent assuming office and who is qualified for the
position the employee holds. A superintendent's spouse who has previously
been employed in a school system may be an employee of the school district.
A superintendent's spouse who is employed under this provision shall not hold
a position in which the spouse supervises certified or classified employees. A
superintendent's spouse may supervise teacher aides and student teachers.
However, the superintendent shall not promote a relative who continues
Page 3 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
employment under an exception of this subsection;
(b) No superintendent shall employ a relative of a school board member of the
district;
(c) No principal's relative shall be employed in the principal's school; and
(d) A relative that is ineligible for employment under paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection may be employed as a substitute for a certified or classified
employee if the relative is not:
1. A regular full-time or part-time employee of the district;
2. Accruing continuing contract status or any other right to continuous
employment;
3. Receiving fringe benefits other than those provided other substitutes; or
4. Receiving preference in employment or assignment over other
substitutes.
(4) No superintendent shall assign a certified or classified staff person to an alternative
education program as part of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to KRS 161.011
or 161.790 as part of a corrective action plan established pursuant to the local
district evaluation plan.
(5) No superintendent shall employ in any position in the district any person who:
(a) Has been convicted of an offense that would classify a person as a violent
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) Has been convicted of a sex crime as defined by KRS 17.500 or a
misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510;
(c) Is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.500 to 17.580; or
(d) Has an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(6) (a) Each application for a school district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Disclose:
Page 4 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
a Being the subject of any investigation or disciplinary action
within the past twelve (12) months; and
b. Any resulting resignation or termination.
related to abusive conduct while employed by any school or school district;
and
2. Consent to a reference check under paragraph (b) of this subsection
and a request for information under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(b) 1. A school district considering an applicant for employment shall
contact each school district, school, or nonpublic school that employs
or previously employed the applicant for a reference check before
extending an offer of employment.
2. A school district, school, or nonpublic school that employs or
previously employed the applicant shall disclose any investigation or
disciplinary action, and any resulting resignation or termination,
related to abusive conduct while the applicant was employed by the
school or school district.
3. A school district, nonpublic school, and any school employees making
a disclosure pursuant to this paragraph of any investigation or
disciplinary action and any resulting resignation or termination shall
be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be
incurred or imposed as a result of:
a. Making the disclosure; or
b. Participating in any judicial proceeding that may result from
making the disclosure.
(c) Upon disclosure of an investigation or disciplinary action involving abusive
conduct by an applicant under paragraph (a) of this subsection or a current
or previous employer under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the school
Page 5 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
district considering the applicant for employment shall:
1. Request all related information and records from the school district or
nonpublic school that previously employed or currently employs the
applicant; and
2. If the application is for a certified position, request information from
the Education Professional Standards Board related to pending
disciplinary action against the applicant involving abusive conduct.
(d) Upon request from a school district under paragraph (c) of this subsection,
the school district or nonpublic school of previous or current employment or
the Educational Professional Standards Board shall provide the requested
information, if applicable, within ten (10) working days.
(e) Any failure to disclose under paragraph (a)1. of this subsection by an
applicant shall result in the applicant being:
1. Ineligible for hire by the school district; and
2. Subject to dismissal or termination if the applicant is hired by the
school district or is a current employee of the school district.
(f) The Education Professional Standards Board shall create and implement
procedures for responding to a school district upon receiving an inquiry
described in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(7) Requirements for background checks shall be as follows:
(a) A superintendent shall require the following individuals to submit to a
national and state criminal background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual:
1. Each new certified or classified hire;
2. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant as defined under KRS
161.185;
Page 6 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
3. A student teacher;
4. A school-based decision making council parent member; and
5. Any adult who is permitted access to school grounds on a regularly
scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a written agreement for the
purpose of providing services directly to a student or students as part of
a school-sponsored program or activity;
(b) 1. The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:
a. Classified and certified individuals employed by the school district
prior to June 27, 2019;
b. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified
position in a Kentucky school district within six (6) months of the
date of hire and who had previously submitted to a national and
state criminal background check and who have a clear CA/N check
for the previous employment; or
c. Student teachers who have submitted to and provide a copy of a
national and state criminal background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through an accredited teacher education institution in which the
student teacher is enrolled and who have a clear CA/N check.
2. The Education Professional Standards Board may promulgate
administrative regulations to impose additional qualifications to meet
the requirements of Pub. L. No. 92-544;
(c) A parent member may serve prior to the receipt of the criminal history
background check and CA/N letter required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection but shall be removed from the council on receipt by the school
district of a report documenting a record of abuse or neglect, or a sex crime or
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS 17.500, or
Page 7 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, and no further procedures
shall be required;
(d) A superintendent may require a volunteer or a visitor to submit to a national
and state criminal history background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual; and
(e) The superintendent of a school district operating under an alternative
transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of Education in
accordance with KRS 156.153(3) shall require the driver of any non-school
bus passenger vehicle authorized to transport students to and from school
pursuant to the alternative transportation plan who does not have a valid
commercial driver's license issued in accordance with KRS Chapter 281A
with an "S" endorsement to:
1. Submit to a national and state criminal background check by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation at least once every three (3) years and a criminal records
check conducted in accordance with KRS 27A.090 in all other years;
2. Submit to drug testing consistent with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt.
40;
3. Provide a biannual driving history record check performed by the
Transportation Cabinet;
4. Provide an annual clear CA/N check;
5. Immediately notify the superintendent of any conviction for a violation
under KRS Chapter 189 for which penalty points are assessed; and
6. Immediately notify the superintendent of any citation or arrest for a
violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 189A. The superintendent
shall inform the Kentucky Department of Education of the notification.
Page 8 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
(8)[(7)] (a) If a certified or classified position remains unfilled after July 31 or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a superintendent may employ an
individual, who will have supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors,
on probationary status pending receipt of the criminal history background
check and a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual. Application for the
criminal record and a request for a clear CA/N check of a probationary
employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment
begins.
(b) Employment shall be contingent on the receipt of the criminal history
background check documenting that the probationary employee has no record
of a sex crime nor as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and receipt
of a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services stating the employee is clear to hire based on no administrative
findings of child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child
abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 161.720 to 161.800 or any other statute to the contrary,
probationary employment under this section shall terminate on receipt by the
school district of a criminal history background check documenting a record
of a sex crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and no
further procedures shall be required.
(9)[(8)] The provisions of KRS 161.790 shall apply to terminate employment of a
certified employee on the basis of a criminal record other than a record of a sex
crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, or on the basis of a CA/N
check showing an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect.
(10)[(9)] (a) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
Page 9 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal
background check is conducted. The results of the state and federal criminal
background check shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. Any fee charged
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(b) Each application form, provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified or classified position, shall conspicuously state the following: "FOR
THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL
AND STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES."
(c) Each application form for a district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Identify the states in which he or she has maintained residency,
including the dates of residency;[ and]
2. Provide picture identification; and
3. List each school district and nonpublic school in which the applicant
has been employed, including the dates of employment.
(11) (a) When an allegation of abusive conduct is made against a school district
employee, the school district employee in receipt of the allegation, whether
communicated in writing, electronically, or orally, shall report the
Page 10 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
allegation to the school principal and as required by KRS 620.030. The
principal shall document the allegation and notify the superintendent or
designee. An investigation of the allegation shall be conducted by the school
district until it is completed and shall not end prior to completion due to the
employee transferring positions within the school district or leaving the
school district.
(b) Notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, all records and references relating to
an allegation of abusive conduct by a school district employee with a
student or minor shall be included and remain in an employee's personnel
file until completion of an investigation. If, after completion of an
investigation, the allegation is determined to be false, all records and
references relating to the allegation shall be removed from the employee's
personnel file.
(12)[(10)] Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the
contrary, any certified or classified employee of the school district shall notify the
superintendent within seven (7) calendar days of being[ when an employee of the
school district is] charged with any offense which is classified as a felony.[,] The
superintendent may transfer the employee to a second position until such time as
the employee is found not guilty, the charges are dismissed, the employee is
terminated, or the superintendent determines that further personnel action is not
required. The employee shall continue to be paid at the same rate of pay he or she
received prior to the transfer. If an employee is charged with an offense outside of
the Commonwealth, this provision may also be applied if the charge would have
been treated as a felony if committed within the Commonwealth. Transfers shall be
made to prevent disruption of the educational process and district operations and in
the interest of students and staff and shall not be construed as evidence of
misconduct.
Page 11 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
(13)[(11)] Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each certified and classified
employee of the school district shall notify the superintendent if he or she has been
found by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or neglected a
child, and if he or she has waived the right to appeal a substantiated finding of child
abuse or neglect or if the substantiated incident was upheld upon appeal. Any
failure to report this finding shall result in the certified or classified employee being
subject to dismissal or termination.
(14) The superintendent shall annually notify school district employees of the self-
reporting requirements of subsections (12) and (13) of this section.
(15)[(12)] The form for requesting a CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services website.
(16) Subsections (1) and (5) to (14) of this section shall apply to public charter schools
as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
Section 3. KRS 156.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) With the advice of the Local Superintendents Advisory Council, the Kentucky
Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing
standards which school districts shall meet in student, program, service, and
operational performance. These regulations shall comply with the expected
outcomes for students and schools set forth in KRS 158.6451. Administrative
regulations shall be promulgated for the following:
(a) Courses of study for the different grades and kinds of common schools
identifying the common curriculum content directly tied to the goals,
outcomes, and assessment strategies developed under KRS 158.645,
158.6451, and 158.6453 and distributed to local school districts and schools.
The administrative regulations shall provide that:
1. If a school offers American sign language, the course shall be accepted
as meeting the foreign language requirements in common schools
Page 12 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
notwithstanding other provisions of law;
2. If a school offers the Reserve Officers Training Corps program, the
course shall be accepted as meeting the physical education requirement
for high school graduation notwithstanding other provisions of law;
3. Every public middle and high school's curriculum shall include
instruction on the Holocaust and other cases of genocide, as defined by
the United Nations Convention on the Prevention and Punishment of the
Crime of Genocide, that a court of competent jurisdiction, whether a
court in the United States or the International Court of Justice, has
determined to have been committed by applying rigorous standards of
due process; and
4. Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, cursive writing shall be
included as a course of study in all elementary schools and shall be
designed to ensure proficiency in cursive writing by the end of grade
five (5);
(b) Courses of study or educational experiences available to students in all middle
and high schools to fulfill the prerequisites for courses in advanced science
and mathematics as defined in KRS 158.845;
(c) The acquisition and use of educational equipment for the schools as
recommended by the Council for Education Technology;
(d) The minimum requirements for high school graduation in light of the
expected outcomes for students and schools set forth in KRS 158.6451. The
minimum requirements shall not include achieving any postsecondary
readiness indicator as described in KRS 158.6455 or any minimum score on a
statewide assessment administered under KRS 158.6453. Student scores from
any assessment administered under KRS 158.6453 that are determined by the
department's technical advisory committee to be valid and reliable at the
Page 13 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
individual level shall be included on the student transcript. The department's
technical advisory committee shall submit its determination to the
commissioner of education and the Legislative Research Commission;
(e) The requirements for an alternative high school diploma for students with
disabilities whose individualized education program indicates that, in
accordance with 20 U.S.C. sec. 1414(d)(1)(A):
1. The student cannot participate in the regular statewide assessment; and
2. An appropriate alternate assessment has been selected for the student
based upon a modified curriculum and an individualized course of
study;
(f) Taking and keeping a school census, and the forms, blanks, and software to be
used in taking and keeping the census and in compiling the required reports.
The board shall create a statewide student identification numbering system
based on students' Social Security numbers. The system shall provide a
student identification number similar to, but distinct from, the Social Security
number, for each student who does not have a Social Security number or
whose parents or guardians choose not to disclose the Social Security number
for the student;
(g) Sanitary and protective construction of public school buildings, toilets,
physical equipment of school grounds, school buildings, and classrooms. With
respect to physical standards of sanitary and protective construction for school
buildings, the Kentucky Board of Education shall adopt the Uniform State
Building Code;
(h) Medical inspection, physical and health education and recreation, and other
regulations necessary or advisable for the protection of the physical welfare
and safety of the public school children. The administrative regulations shall
set requirements for student health standards to be met by all students in
Page 14 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
grades four (4), eight (8), and twelve (12) pursuant to the outcomes described
in KRS 158.6451. The administrative regulations shall permit a student who
received a physical examination no more than six (6) months prior to his or
her initial admission to Head Start to substitute that physical examination for
the physical examination required by the Kentucky Board of Education of all
students upon initial admission to the public schools, if the physical
examination given in the Head Start program meets all the requirements of the
physical examinations prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education;
(i) A vision examination by an optometrist or ophthalmologist that shall be
required by the Kentucky Board of Education. The administrative regulations
shall require evidence that a vision examination that meets the criteria
prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education has been performed. This
evidence shall be submitted to the school no later than January 1 of the first
year that a three (3), four (4), five (5), or six (6) year-old child is enrolled in a
public school, public preschool, or Head Start program;
(j) 1. [Beginning with the 2010-2011 school year, ]A dental screening or
examination by a dentist, dental hygienist, physician, registered nurse,
advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant that shall be
required by the Kentucky Board of Education. The administrative
regulations shall require evidence that a dental screening or examination
that meets the criteria prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education
has been performed. This evidence shall be submitted to the school no
later than January 1 of the first year that a five (5) or six (6) year-old
child is enrolled in a public school.
2. A child shall be referred to a licensed dentist if a dental screening or
examination performed by anyone other than a licensed dentist identifies
the possibility of dental disease;
Page 15 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
(k) The transportation of children to and from school;
(l) The fixing of holidays on which schools may be closed and special days to be
observed, and the pay of teachers during absence because of sickness or
quarantine or when the schools are closed because of quarantine;
(m) The preparation of budgets and salary schedules for the several school
districts under the management and control of the Kentucky Board of
Education;
(n) A uniform series of forms and blanks, educational and financial, including
forms of contracts, for use in the several school districts;
(o) The disposal of real and personal property owned by local boards of
education; and
(p) The development and implementation of procedures, for all students who are
homeless children and youths as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 11434a(2), to do
the following:
1. Awarding and accepting of credit, including partial credit, for all
coursework satisfactorily completed by a student while enrolled at
another school;
2. Allowing a student who was previously enrolled in a course required for
graduation the opportunity, to the extent practicable, to complete the
course, at no cost to the student, before the beginning of the next school
year;
3. Awarding a diploma, at the student's request, by a district from which
the student transferred, if the student transfers schools at any time after
the completion of the student's second year of high school and the
student is ineligible to graduate from the district to which the student
transfers, but meets the graduation requirements of the district from
which the student transferred; and
Page 16 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
4. Exempting the student from all coursework and other requirements
imposed by the local board of education that are in addition to the
minimum requirements for high school graduation established by the
Kentucky Board of Education pursuant to paragraph (d) of this
subsection in the district to which the student transfers, if the student
transfers schools at any time after the completion of the student's second
year of high school and the student is ineligible to graduate both from
the district to which the student transfers and the district from which the
student transferred.
(2) (a) At the request of a local board of education or a school council, a local school
district superintendent shall request that the Kentucky Board of Education
waive any administrative regulation promulgated by that board. [Beginning in
the 1996-97 school year, ]A request for waiver of any administrative
regulation shall be submitted to the Kentucky Board of Education in writing
with appropriate justification for the waiver. The Kentucky Board of
Education may approve the request when the school district or school has
demonstrated circumstances that may include but are not limited to the
following:
1. An alternative approach will achieve the same result required by the
administrative regulation;
2. Implementation of the administrative regulation will cause a hardship on
the school district or school or jeopardize the continuation or
development of programs; or
3. There is a finding of good cause for the waiver.
(b) The following shall not be subject to waiver:
1. Administrative regulations relating to health and safety;
2. Administrative regulations relating to civil rights;
Page 17 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
3. Administrative regulations required by federal law; and
4. Administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS
158.6451, 158.6453, 158.6455, and this section, relating to measurement
of performance outcomes and determination of successful districts or
schools, except upon issues relating to the grade configuration of
schools.
(c) Any waiver granted under this subsection shall be subject to revocation upon
a determination by the Kentucky Board of Education that the school district or
school holding the waiver has subsequently failed to meet the intent of the
waiver.
(3) Any private, parochial, or church school may voluntarily comply with:
(a) Curriculum, certification, and textbook standards established by the Kentucky
Board of Education; and
(b) Employment standards established in Section 4 of this Act;
and be certified upon application to the board by such schools.
(4) Any public school that violates the provisions of KRS 158.854 shall be subject to a
penalty to be assessed by the commissioner of education as follows:
(a) The first violation shall result in a fine of no less than one (1) week's revenue
from the sale of the competitive food;
(b) Subsequent violations shall result in a fine of no less than one (1) month's
revenue from the sale of the competitive food;
(c) "Habitual violations," which means five (5) or more violations within a six (6)
month period, shall result in a six (6) month ban on competitive food sales for
the violating school; and
(d) Revenue collected as a result of the fines in this subsection shall be
transferred to the food service fund of the local school district.
Section 4. KRS 160.151 is amended to read as follows:
Page 18 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
(1) For purposes of this section, "certified nonpublic school" means a private,
parochial, or church school that has voluntarily been certified by the Kentucky
Board of Education in accordance with subsection (3) of Section 3 of this Act.
(2)[(1)] (a) 1. A certified nonpublic school shall[private, parochial, or church
school that has voluntarily been certified by the Kentucky Board of
Education in accordance with KRS 156.160(3) may] require a national
and state criminal background check and require a clear CA/N check, as
defined in KRS 160.380, on all new certified hires in the school and
student teachers assigned to the school and may require a new national
and state criminal background check and require a clear CA/N check on
each certified teacher once every five (5) years of employment.
2. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified position in
a Kentucky school within six (6) months of the date of the hire and who
had previously submitted to a national and state criminal background
check and were required to have a clear CA/N check for previous
employment may be excluded from the initial national or state criminal
background checks.
(b) The national criminal history background check shall be conducted by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation. The state criminal history background check
shall be conducted by the Department of Kentucky State Police or the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
(c) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation by
the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal background
check has been conducted. Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky
State Police, the Administrative Office of the Courts, or the Federal Bureau of
Page 19 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
Investigation shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing
the request and conducting the search.
(3)[(2)] (a) When a certified nonpublic[If a] school requires a criminal background
check or requires a clear CA/N check under this section[for a new hire], the
school shall conspicuously include the following disclosure statement on each
application or renewal form provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified position: "STATE LAW AUTHORIZES THIS SCHOOL TO
REQUIRE A CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF[IS CLEAR TO HIRE
BASED ON NO FINDINGS OF SUBSTANTIATED] CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES[AS A CONDITION OF
EMPLOYMENT FOR THIS TYPE OF POSITION]."
(b) The school or school board may require an adult who is permitted access to
school grounds on a regularly scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a
written agreement for the purpose of providing services directly to a student
or students as part of a school-sponsored program or activity, a volunteer, or a
visitor to submit to a national criminal history check by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and state criminal history background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police or Administrative Office of the Courts and require a
clear CA/N check.
(c) Any request for records from the Department of Kentucky State Police under
this section shall be on an applicant fingerprint card provided by the
Department of Kentucky State Police if required. The results of the state
Page 20 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
criminal background check and the results of the national criminal history
background check[, if requested,] shall be sent to the hiring superintendent.
When[If] a background check of child abuse and neglect records is requested,
the person seeking employment shall provide to the hiring superintendent a
clear CA/N check.
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(e) Every five (5) years from the year an individual was required to submit to a
national and state criminal records check under subsection (2) of this
section, a certified nonpublic school shall require the individual to submit to
a state records check.
(4)[(3)] (a) A certified nonpublic school shall[voluntarily implementing the
provisions of this chapter may choose] not[ to] employ any person who is a
violent offender as defined by KRS 17.165(2), has been convicted of a sex
crime which is classified as a felony as defined by KRS 17.165(1), or has
committed a violent crime as defined in KRS 17.165(3) or persons with a
substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services. A certified nonpublic school may
employ, at its discretion, persons convicted of sex crimes classified as a
misdemeanor.
(b) If a school term has begun and a certified position remains unfilled or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a certified nonpublic school
[implementing this chapter] may employ an individual who will have
supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors on probationary status
pending receipt of a criminal history background check or the receipt of a
clear CA/N check, provided by the individual.
Page 21 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
(c) Employment, including probationary employment, at a certified nonpublic
school shall[implementing this chapter may] be contingent on the receipt of a
criminal history background check documenting that the employee has no[a]
record as a violent offender, of a sex crime, or of a violent crime as defined in
KRS 17.165 and[or] the receipt of a clear CA/N check, provided by the
individual.
[(d) Nonpublic schools implementing this chapter may terminate probationary
employment under this section upon receipt of a criminal history background
check documenting a record as a violent offender, of a sex crime, or of a
violent crime as defined in KRS 17.165 or the receipt of a clear CA/N check.]
(5)[(4)] The form for requesting a [clear ]CA/N check shall be made available on the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services website[Web site].
(6) A certified nonpublic school considering an applicant for employment shall
contact each nonpublic school or school district that currently employs or
previously employed the applicant for a reference check in accordance with
standards established by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(7) A certified nonpublic school shall not enter into a nondisclosure agreement
relating to misconduct involving a minor or student, including abusive conduct as
defined in Section 2 of this Act.
Section 5. KRS 156.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education shall establish, direct, and maintain a
statewide program of professional development to improve instruction in the public
schools.
(2) (a) Each local school district superintendent shall appoint a certified school
employee to fulfill the role and responsibilities of a professional development
coordinator who shall disseminate professional development information to
schools and personnel. Upon request by a school council or any employees of
Page 22 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
the district, the coordinator shall provide technical assistance to the council or
the personnel that may include assisting with needs assessments, analyzing
school data, planning and evaluation assistance, organizing districtwide
programs requested by school councils or groups of teachers, or other
coordination activities.
(b)[(a)] The manner of appointment, qualifications, and other duties of the
professional development coordinator shall be established by Kentucky Board
of Education through promulgation of administrative regulations.
(c)[(b)] The local district professional development coordinator shall participate
in the Kentucky Department of Education annual training program for local
school district professional development coordinators. The training program
may include[,] but is not[ be] limited to[,] the demonstration of various
approaches to needs assessment and planning; strategies for implementing
long-term, school-based professional development; strategies for
strengthening teachers' roles in the planning, development, and evaluation of
professional development; and demonstrations of model professional
development programs. The training shall include information about teacher
learning opportunities relating to the core content standards. The Kentucky
Department of Education shall regularly collect and distribute this
information.
(3) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide or facilitate optional,
professional development programs for certified personnel throughout the
Commonwealth that are based on the statewide needs of teachers, administrators,
and other education personnel. Programs may include classified staff and parents
when appropriate. Programs offered or facilitated by the department shall be at
locations and times convenient to local school personnel and shall be made
accessible through the use of technology when appropriate. They shall include
Page 23 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
programs that: address the goals for Kentucky schools as stated in KRS 158.6451,
including reducing the achievement gaps as determined by an equity analysis of the
disaggregated student performance data from the state assessment program
developed under KRS 158.6453; engage educators in effective learning processes
and foster collegiality and collaboration; and provide support for staff to
incorporate newly acquired skills into their work through practicing the skills,
gathering information about the results, and reflecting on their efforts. Professional
development programs shall be made available to teachers based on their needs
which shall include but not be limited to the following areas:
(a) Strategies to reduce the achievement gaps among various groups of students
and to provide continuous progress;
(b) Curriculum content and methods of instruction for each content area,
including differentiated instruction;
(c) School-based decision making;
(d) Assessment literacy;
(e) Integration of performance-based student assessment into daily classroom
instruction;
(f) Nongraded primary programs;
(g) Research-based instructional practices;
(h) Instructional uses of technology;
(i) Curriculum design to serve the needs of students with diverse learning styles
and skills and of students of diverse cultures;
(j) Instruction in reading, including phonics, phonemic awareness,
comprehension, fluency, and vocabulary;
(k) Educational leadership; and
(l) Strategies to incorporate character education throughout the curriculum.
(4) The department shall assist school personnel in assessing the impact of professional
Page 24 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
development on their instructional practices and student learning.
(5) (a) The department shall assist districts and school councils with the development
of long-term school and district improvement plans that include multiple
strategies for professional development based on the assessment of needs at
the school level.
(b)[(a)] Professional development strategies may include but are not limited to
participation in subject matter academies, teacher networks, training institutes,
workshops, seminars, and study groups; collegial planning; action research;
mentoring programs; appropriate university courses; and other forms of
professional development.
(c)[(b)] In planning the use of the four (4) days for professional development
under KRS 158.070, school councils and districts shall give priority to
programs that increase teachers' understanding of curriculum content and
methods of instruction appropriate for each content area based on individual
school plans. The district may use up to one (1) day to provide district-wide
training and training that is mandated by state or federal law. Only those
employees identified in the mandate or affected by the mandate shall be
required to attend the training.
(d)[(c)] State funds allocated for professional development shall be used to
support professional development initiatives that are consistent with local
school improvement and professional development plans and teachers'
individual growth plans. The funds may be used throughout the year for all
staff, including classified and certified staff and parents on school councils or
committees. A portion of the funds allocated to each school council under
KRS 160.345 may be used to prepare or enhance the teachers' knowledge and
teaching practices related to the content and subject matter that are required
for their specific classroom assignments.
Page 25 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
(6) (a) The Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall post on its web
page evidence-based suicide prevention awareness information, to include
recognizing the warning signs of a suicide crisis. The web page shall include
information related to suicide prevention training opportunities offered by the
cabinet or an agency recognized by the cabinet as a training provider.
(b) Every public school and public charter school shall provide two (2) evidence-
based suicide prevention awareness lessons each school year, the first by
September 15 and the second by January 15, either in person, by live
streaming, or via a video recording to all students in grades six (6) through
twelve (12). Every public school shall provide an opportunity for any student
absent on the day the evidence-based suicide prevention awareness lesson was
initially presented to receive the lesson at a later time. The information may
be obtained from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or from a
commercially developed suicide prevention training program.
(c) 1. Each school year, a minimum of one (1) hour of high-quality evidence-
based suicide prevention training, including risk factors, warning signs,
protective factors, response procedures, referral, postvention, and the
recognition of signs and symptoms of possible mental illness, shall be
required for all school district employees with job duties requiring direct
contact with students in grades four (4) through twelve (12). The
training shall be provided either in person, by live streaming, or via a
video recording and may be included in the four (4) days of professional
development under KRS 158.070. As used in this subparagraph,
"postvention" means a series of planned supports and interventions with
persons affected by a suicide for the purpose of facilitating the grieving
or adjustment process, stabilizing the environment, reducing the risk of
negative behaviors, and limiting the risk of further suicides through
Page 26 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
contagion.
2. When a staff member subject to the training under subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph is initially hired during a school year in which the
training is not required, the local district shall provide suicide prevention
materials to the staff member for review.
(d) The requirements of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection shall apply to
public charter schools as a health and safety requirement under KRS
160.1592(1).
(7) (a) By November 1 of each year, a minimum of one (1) hour of training on how
to respond to an active shooter situation shall be required for all school district
employees with job duties requiring direct contact with students. The training
shall be provided either in person, by live streaming, or via a video recording
prepared by the Kentucky Department of Criminal Justice Training in
collaboration with the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, the Kentucky
Department of Education, and the Center for School Safety and may be
included in the four (4) days of professional development under KRS
158.070.
(b) When a staff member subject to the training requirements of this subsection is
initially hired after the training has been provided for the school year, the
local district shall provide materials on how to respond to an active shooter
situation.
(c) The requirements of this subsection shall also apply to public charter schools
as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(8) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall develop and maintain a list of
approved comprehensive evidence-informed trainings on child abuse and
neglect prevention, recognition, and reporting that encompass child physical,
sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect.
Page 27 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
(b) The trainings shall be web-based or in-person and cover, at a minimum, the
following topics:
1. Recognizing child physical, sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect;
2. Reporting suspected child abuse and neglect in Kentucky as required by
KRS 620.030 and the appropriate documentation;
3. Responding to the child; and
4. Understanding the response of child protective services.
(c) The trainings shall include a questionnaire or other basic assessment tool upon
completion to document basic knowledge of training components.
(d) Each local board of education shall adopt one (1) or more trainings from the
list approved by the Department of Education to be implemented by schools.
(e) All school administrators, certified personnel, office staff, instructional
assistants, and coaches and extracurricular sponsors who are employed by the
school district shall complete the implemented training or trainings within
ninety (90) days of being hired and then every two (2) years after.
(f) Every public school shall prominently display the statewide child abuse
hotline number administered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
the National Human Trafficking Reporting Hotline number administered by
the United States Department for Health and Human Services, and the Safe
Haven Baby Boxes Crisis Line number administered by the Safe Haven Baby
Boxes national organization or any equivalent successor entity.
(g) The requirements of this subsection shall also apply to public charter schools
as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(9) (a) By May 1, 2026, the Kentucky Department of Education, in collaboration
with the Education Professional Standards Board, shall develop a training
for school district employees, to be provided via video recording, related to
appropriate relationships and communication with students, inappropriate
Page 28 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
relationships and communication with students, sexual grooming, and
sexual misconduct.
(b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, and every five (5) years
thereafter, every local school district shall require all employees to undergo
the training described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) When an employee is hired by a district during a school year in which the
training is not required, the school district shall require the employee to
complete the training within ninety (90) days of hiring.
(d) The requirements of this subsection shall apply to public charter schools as
a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(10) The Department of Education shall establish an electronic consumer bulletin board
that posts information regarding professional development providers and programs
as a service to school district central office personnel, school councils, teachers, and
administrators. Participation on the electronic consumer bulletin board shall be
voluntary for professional development providers or vendors, but shall include all
programs sponsored by the department. Participants shall provide the following
information: program title; name of provider or vendor; qualifications of the
presenters or instructors; objectives of the program; program length; services
provided, including follow-up support; costs for participation and costs of
materials; names of previous users of the program, addresses, and telephone
numbers; and arrangements required. Posting information on the bulletin board by
the department shall not be viewed as an endorsement of the quality of any specific
provider or program.
(11)[(10)] The Department of Education shall provide training to address the
characteristics and instructional needs of students at risk of school failure and most
likely to drop out of school. The training shall be developed to meet the specific
needs of all certified and classified personnel depending on their relationship with
Page 29 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
these students. The training for instructional personnel shall be designed to provide
and enhance skills of personnel to:
(a) Identify at-risk students early in elementary schools as well as at-risk and
potential dropouts in the middle and high schools;
(b) Plan specific instructional strategies to teach at-risk students;
(c) Improve the academic achievement of students at risk of school failure by
providing individualized and extra instructional support to increase
expectations for targeted students;
(d) Involve parents as partners in ways to help their children and to improve their
children's academic progress; and
(e) Significantly reduce the dropout rate of all students.
(12)[(11)] The department shall establish teacher academies to the extent funding is
available in cooperation with postsecondary education institutions for elementary,
middle school, and high school faculty in core disciplines, utilizing facilities and
faculty from universities and colleges, local school districts, and other appropriate
agencies throughout the state. Priority for participation shall be given to those
teachers who are teaching core discipline courses for which they do not have a
major or minor or the equivalent. Participation of teachers shall be voluntary.
(13)[(12)] The department shall annually provide to the oversight council established in
KRS 15A.063, the information received from local schools pursuant to KRS
158.449.
Section 6. KRS 161.151 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in Section 2 of this Act, all records and references relating to an
allegation of a criminal offense committed by a school employee that did not lead to
formal charges and all records relating to a criminal proceeding in which a school
employee was found not guilty or the charges were dismissed shall be removed
from the school employee's personnel file by the superintendent or the
Page 30 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
superintendent's designee in the local school district.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not preclude a school district
from separately investigating, taking action upon, and creating and maintaining
records on the same or a similar fact situation upon which the allegations of a
criminal offense was based.
Section 7. KRS 158.4431 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, a "Kentucky guardian" or "guardian" means an employee of
a local board of education who is employed for the purpose of providing school
safety and security to students and staff on a school site. A person providing
services as a guardian may only include honorably discharged veterans, retired
Kentucky state troopers, retired special and sworn law enforcement officers, and
former federal law enforcement officers. A guardian certified by the Center for
School Safety as having met all requirements of this section is deemed to be an
authorized individual under KRS 527.070(3)(f) and may be armed with a firearm on
school property.
(2) Local boards of education may employ as many guardians as the board considers
necessary for the safety and security of its schools.
(3) Prior to hiring a guardian, the local board of education shall require the applicant to
provide certification from the Center for School Safety that he or she meets all of
the following minimum requirements:
(a) Is a citizen of the United States and the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(b) Has received a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma;
(c) Is currently licensed under KRS 237.110 to carry a concealed weapon;
(d) Has completed and passed background checks as required pursuant to KRS
160.380(7)[(6)](a), and has not been convicted of any felony, any
misdemeanor under KRS 510.120, 510.130, 510.140, or 510.148, or a
criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any degree
Page 31 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
of rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct under KRS Chapter 510,
or have had any offense listed in this paragraph expunged;
(e) Has passed a medical examination completed by a licensed physician,
physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse to determine if he or
she can perform the duties of a guardian;
(f) Has passed a drug screening test administered or approved by the Kentucky
Law Enforcement Council. A person shall be deemed to have passed a drug
screening test if the results of the test are negative for the use of an illegal
controlled substance or prescription drug abuse;
(g) Has passed the following examinations administered by the Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council:
1. A background investigation to determine the person's suitability for the
position of guardian;
2. A psychological suitability screening to determine the person's
suitability to perform guardian duties; and
3. A polygraph examination to determine the person's suitability to
perform guardian duties;
(h) Has passed the following courses provided by the Department of Criminal
Justice Training:
1. Active Shooter Response;
2. Enhanced Handgun Performance; and
3. Patrol Rifle;
(i) Has passed the marksmanship qualification requirement for a retired peace
officer as specified in KRS 237.140;
(j) Has been honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States
within the five (5) years immediately preceding an initial contract to be a
guardian as evidenced by a Department of Defense form DD 214, or is a
Page 32 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
retired Kentucky state trooper, retired special or sworn law enforcement
officer, or former federal law enforcement officer. Each agency that employed
a retired Kentucky state trooper, retired special law enforcement officer, or
sworn law enforcement officer shall provide to the retired individual proof of
prior employment in a prompt and efficient manner, without charge to the
individual; and
(k) Has met any other requirements imposed by the local board of education,
which may include but are not limited to a preemployment written
examination.
(4) Each guardian shall be required to complete annual firearm proficiency testing and
shall meet the standard in the same manner as set forth in KRS 237.140(4)(a) to (c).
(5) Each guardian shall be required to complete the course requirements for School
Resource Officer Training I (SRO I) as set forth in KRS 158.4414(8).
(6) The employing local board of education may require the completion of any
additional courses and training as determined to be necessary by the board.
(7) Any cost associated with subsections (3) to (6) of this section shall be the
responsibility of the guardian unless otherwise agreed to by the employing local
board of education. The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall not charge more
to guardians for tests, assessments, or training completed than what is customarily
charged to any other type of applicant tested, assessed, or trained by the council.
(8) A local board of education employing a guardian shall collaborate with the local
police department, local sheriff, area post of the Department of Kentucky State
Police, and the state school security marshal in order to adopt school district policy
regarding:
(a) The job description of the guardian, including but not limited to the scope of
duties, responsibilities, and direct supervisor of the guardian;
(b) The uniform to be worn by guardians that would best suit the needs of the
Page 33 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
schools while also allowing outside agencies to easily identify guardians;
(c) The procedures, processes, and chain of command to be used during an
emergency in which law enforcement agencies are called to the school; and
(d) The type of firearm and ammunition to be used by the guardian, if any.
(9) A local board of education shall be immune from civil or criminal liability in all
claims arising out of any action of a guardian.
(10) Guardians shall possess all the immunities and defenses now available or hereafter
made available under state law to sheriffs, constables granted peace officer powers,
and police officers in any suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in
the course of their employment.
(11) Nothing in this section requires a local board of education to hire or provide
guardians. Participation by a local board of education in the use of a guardian is
voluntary and subject to the availability of local school district funds. Any local
board of education that opts to participate shall do so at its own expense.
Section 8. KRS 156.492 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education may enter into an agreement with any
building and construction trade organization to develop a training program for
school counselors providing services to students in the Commonwealth. The
purpose of the training program shall be to promote building and construction
trades and training facilities available to students by making school counselors
aware of what is available to students participating in the building and construction
trade. The training program shall include information relating to:
(a) The pay and benefits available to people who work in the building and
construction trades; and
(b) Job opportunities, pre-apprenticeships, apprenticeships, and pathways within
the building and construction trade industry.
(2) The participating trade organization shall ensure ample opportunities for school
Page 34 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 20
counselors that serve grades seven (7) through twelve (12) to complete the training
created under subsection (1) of this section annually and shall bear all costs
associated with the training. The participating trade organization may choose to
offer professional development opportunities to teachers who serve students in
grades seven (7) through twelve (12), if resources are available for this purpose.
(3) The department shall include the training program created in this section on the
electronic consumer bulletin board created pursuant to KRS 156.095[(9)] if
requested by the training program.
(4) A school counselor serving students in grades seven (7) through twelve (12) may
complete four (4) hours of training developed under this section which shall count
towards the twenty-one (21) hours required annually pursuant to KRS
156.101(4)(b)2.
(5) Local boards of education or school-based decision making councils may
incorporate this training as part of the four (4) days of professional development
required pursuant to KRS 158.070(3)(a) for teachers who serve students in grades
seven (7) through twelve (12) if offered by the participating trade organization.
Page 35 of 35
XXXX 12/27/2024 11:28 AM Jacketed